Utah statutes.
48-2c-1507.   Limit of one profession.

A company organized to render professional services under this chapter may render only one specific type of professional services, and services ancillary to them, and may not engage in any business other than rendering the professional services which it was organized to render, and services ancillary to them; provided, however, that a professional services company may own real and personal property necessary or appropriate for rendering the type of professional service it was organized to render and may invest its funds in real estate, mortgages, stocks, bonds, and any other type of investments.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

